District of Columbia statutes.
31-203

Repealed

Required annual financial statements of companies or associations — Contents; publication.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-42, § 7(a), 40 DCR 6020
This section is referenced in § 31-4901.
1981 Ed., § 35-103.